Missouri, session 2026, HB1770.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 556, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 556.035, to read as follows:
556.035. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 556.036, prosecutions for
2 abuse or neglect of a child under eighteen years of age under section 568.060 must be
3 commenced within ten years from the victim's eighteenth birthday.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.